California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person who currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 193, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.10.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county of the 29th class, commencing January 1, 2009, the department may issue five additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places per year, for a period of three years. Any premises to qualify for a license under this paragraph shall have a seating capacity for 50 or more diners. In no event shall more than 15 on-sale general licenses for bona fide eating places be issued under this paragraph.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county of the 29th class, the department, in addition to those licenses issued pursuant to paragraph (1), may
 issue no more than a total of five additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places from January 1, 2017, to December 31, 2017, inclusive. Any premises to qualify for a license under this paragraph shall have a seating capacity for 25 or more diners.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county of the 29th class, commencing January 1, 2018, in addition to those licenses issued pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), the department may issue five additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places per year, for a period of four years. Any premises to qualify for a license under this paragraph shall have a seating capacity for 25 or more diners. In no event shall more than 20 on-sale general licenses for bona fide eating places be issued under this
 paragraph.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county of the 29th class, commencing January 1, 2021, in addition to those licenses issued pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, the department may issue 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places per year, for a period of five years. Any premises to qualify for a license under this paragraph shall have a seating capacity for 25 or more diners. 

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a person who currently holds a valid on-sale general license for
 seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(2) A license issued under paragraph (3) or paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) on and after January 1, 2021, shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(e) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license
 privileges or restrictions established by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 53, Sec. 1.   (AB 2459)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.11.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county of the 18th class the department may issue five additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places per year, until January 1, 2016. To qualify for a license under this section the premises upon which a bona fide public eating place is operated shall have a seating capacity for 50 or more diners. Not more than a total of 15 on-sale general licenses shall be issued under this section.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.

(c) This chapter does not prohibit a person who currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 467, Sec. 1.   (AB 1320)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.12.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county of the 24th class, the department may issue no more than a total of five additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places from January 1, 2014, to December 31, 2016, inclusive. To qualify for a license under this section, the premises upon which a bona fide public eating place is operated shall have a seating capacity for 50 or more diners.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.

(c) This chapter does not prohibit a person who currently holds a valid on-sale general
 license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 13.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.13.

(a) Notwithstanding this chapter, in any county of the sixth class, the department may issue no more than a total of five new original neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses to premises located in any of the census tracts listed in subdivision (b) per year beginning on January 1, 2017, until a total of 40 new licenses authorized by this section are issued.

(b) To qualify for a license issued pursuant to this section, the premises for which the license would apply shall be located within one of the following United States Bureau of Census census tracts,
 corresponding to those identified within the
 2020 Census, located within the City and County of San Francisco, subject to the following limitations:

(1) United States Bureau of the Census census tract 612000, 232000, 234000, 233000, or 230030. No more than a total of 10 neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within all of these tracts.

(2) United States Bureau of the Census census tract 258000 or 257020. No more than a total of four neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within all of these tracts.

(3) United States Bureau of the Census census tract 264030. No more than a total of two neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within this tract.

(4) United States Bureau of the Census census tract 255010, 255020, 256000, 260020, 260010, 260040, 261000, or 263010. No more than a total of 10 neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within all of these tracts.

(5) United States Bureau of the Census census tract 309000, 310000, or 312010. No more than a total of four neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within all of these tracts.

(6) United States Bureau of the Census census tract 330010, 330020, 329010, 328010, 353000, or 354000. No more than a total of five neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within all of these tracts.

(7) United States Bureau of the Census census tract 328020, 329020,
 351010, 351020, 352010, or 352020. No more than a total of five neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within all of these tracts.

(c) In issuing the licenses pursuant to this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961. A license shall not be issued pursuant to this section to an applicant until any existing on-sale licenses issued to the applicant for the same premises are canceled.

(d) (1) A person who currently holds an on-sale general license for a premises, who currently holds any interest in an on-sale general license for a premises, who has held an on-sale general license for a premises within the 12 months before the date of the drawing required by Section 23961, or who has held any interest in an on-sale general
 license for a premises within the 12 months before the date of the drawing required by Section 23961, shall not apply for a license issued pursuant to this section for that licensed premises.

(2) In addition to the other requirements of this section, an application for a neighborhood-restricted on-sale general license shall be subject to all the requirements that apply to an on-sale general license for a bona fide eating place.

(e) (1) A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferred between counties.

(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), a license issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferred to any other premises.

(3) Paragraph (2) shall not apply to any licensee whose premises have been destroyed as a result of fire or any act of God or other force beyond the control of the licensee, for whom the provisions of Section 24081 shall apply.

(4) The department may allow a license issued pursuant to this section to be transferred within the same neighborhood, as described in paragraphs (1) to (7), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(5) A license issued pursuant
 to this section shall not be transferred to any person, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation. This provision shall not apply to licenses transferred under Section 24071, 24071.1, or 24071.2.

(f) Following the cancellation or revocation of a license issued pursuant to this section, the department may issue one additional new original neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general license following the procedure set forth in Section 23961 and the provisions of this section.

(g) A person that holds a neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general license issued pursuant to this section shall not exchange that license for an on-sale license for public premises.

(h) Except as specified herein, a neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general license may exercise all of the
 privileges, and is subject to all the restrictions, of an on-sale general license for a bona fide eating place.

(i) (1) Commencing January 1, 2025, subject to paragraph (2), a licensee may exercise off-sale privileges pursuant to Sections 23401 and 23401.5. This section does not limit the authority of the department to impose conditions on a license pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 23800).

(2) The holder of a neighborhood restricted special on-sale general license issued before January 1, 2025, shall not exercise off-sale privileges pursuant to Section 23401 and 23401.5 unless the department approves a petition submitted by the licensee requesting to exercise off-sale privileges. If the department
 determines that good cause exists to deny the petition, in whole or in part, the department shall endorse the prohibition or other restriction as a condition on the license, which is subject to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 23800). The licensee may make a written request for hearing on the denial of a petition in the same manner as provided in Section 23805.

(j) The department shall adopt rules and regulations to enforce this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.   (AB 2359)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.14.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of Inyo, the department may issue no more than a total of five additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places, public premises, or both from January 1, 2017, to December 31, 2019, inclusive. To qualify for a license under this section, the premises upon which a bona fide public eating place is operated shall have a seating capacity for 50 or more diners.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.

(c) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   (AB 1558)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.15.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of Mariposa, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. To qualify for a license under this section, the premises upon which a bona fide public eating place is operated shall have a seating capacity for 50 or more diners. 

(b) The Board of Supervisors of the County of Mariposa, by resolution, may specify the maximum number of licenses to be issued under this section in any year, not to exceed five. Such a resolution shall be effective for one year and shall be adopted and submitted to the
 department no later than July 1 of the year to which the resolution applies. The department shall not issue more than five licenses under this section per year. In the event that the board of supervisors fails to submit a resolution under this subdivision by July 1 of any year, the department may issue any licenses that have not been issued under this section during that year.

(c) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.

(d) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section. 

(e) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(f) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 53, Sec. 2.   (AB 2459)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.16.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of El Dorado, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. The department shall not issue more than four licenses under this section per year.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961. 

(c) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

 (e) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 889, Sec. 1.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.17.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of Shasta, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. The department shall not issue more than four licenses under this section per year.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961. 

(c) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(e) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 889, Sec. 2.   (SB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.18.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of Nevada, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. The department shall not issue more than four licenses under this section per year.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.

(c) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from
 applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(e) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 113, Sec. 1.   (SB 787)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.19.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of Placer, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. The department shall not issue more than four licenses under this section per year.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961. 

(c) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from
 applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(e) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 282, Sec. 1.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.20.

(a) For purposes of this section, “retail center” means a multitenant shopping center that contains at least 300,000 square feet of retail shopping space open to the public.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places in the County of El Dorado, and a total
 of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places in the County of Placer.

(A) The department shall not issue more than four licenses under this section, per county, in the first year after this section takes effect.

(B) To qualify for a license under this section, the premises upon which a bona fide public eating place is operated shall be located in a retail center. The department shall issue at least three of the licenses authorized by this
 section, per county, for a premises located in a retail center that contains at least 1,000,000 square feet of retail shopping space open to the public.

(C) A licensee that holds an on-sale general license for a bona fide public eating place that is in a retail center shall not be eligible to apply for a license under this section for the same licensed premises.

(2) A county board of supervisors may submit a resolution to the department by July 1 of any year in which licenses authorized by this section have not been issued that further restricts the maximum number of licenses that may be issued in that county pursuant to paragraph (1). If the county board of supervisors does not submit a resolution, the department may issue any licenses that have
 not been issued.

(c) In issuing any license pursuant to this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961. 

(d) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section. 

(e) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section. 

(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor. 

(f) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section. 

(g) Following the cancellation or revocation of a license issued under this section, the department may issue one additional license pursuant to the procedures set forth in Section 23961 and this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 312, Sec. 1.   (AB 2589)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.21.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of Colusa, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961. 

(c) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for
 seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(e) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This
 designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 153, Sec. 1.   (AB 445)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.22.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: 

(1) “Hospitality zone” means an area designated by an ordinance in the City and County of San Francisco on or after January 1, 2026, that contains at least 1,000,000 square feet of retail shopping space open to the public. The City and County of San Francisco shall not designate more than one hospitality zone pursuant to this section. 

(2) “Local governing body” means the local governing body of the City and County of San Francisco.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department, subject to subdivision (c), may issue up to 20 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places located within a designated hospitality zone.

(2) (A) During the first year following the adoption of a valid ordinance to designate a hospitality zone and the submission of that ordinance to the department by the local governing body, the department may issue up to 10 of the 20 licenses during the same calendar year. 

(B) In any subsequent year, the department may issue any licenses that have not been issued, not exceeding five licenses per calendar year.

(c) (1) In order to authorize the issuance of additional licenses pursuant to
 this section, an ordinance adopted by a local governing body to designate or modify a hospitality zone shall include all of the following:

(A) Information as may be necessary to identify the boundaries of the hospitality zone.

(B) A finding that the designated area meets the definition of hospitality zone established in this section.

(C) A finding that the issuance of additional licenses within this hospitality zone would serve the public convenience or necessity.

(2) A local governing body may, in an ordinance designating or modifying a hospitality zone, further limit the maximum number of additional licenses to be issued within its hospitality zone.

(3) (A) A local
 governing body may, in an ordinance designating or modifying a hospitality zone, further limit the areas within the boundaries of the hospitality zone where additional licenses may be issued. 

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an ordinance shall designate a single contiguous area that qualifies as a hospitality zone to meet the requirements of this section.

(4) Upon the adoption of an ordinance to modify or repeal a hospitality zone, the local governing body shall submit the ordinance to the department.

(d) Any ordinance to establish, modify, or repeal a hospitality zone shall be effective commencing the following July 1.

(e) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961.
 

(f) A licensee that holds an on-sale general license for a bona fide public eating place that is in a hospitality zone shall not be eligible to apply for a license under this section for the same licensed premises.

(g) (1) A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferred between counties, nor shall it be transferred to any location outside of the
 hospitality zone or otherwise not qualifying under this section.

(2) A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferred to any person, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation. This provision shall not apply to licenses transferred under Section 24071, 24071.1, or 24071.2.

(3) A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(h) Following the cancellation or revocation of a license issued under this section, the department shall issue one additional license pursuant to the procedures set forth in Section 23961 and this section.

(i) (1) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. 

(2) A designation pursuant to this subdivision shall not alter any license privileges or restrictions established pursuant to this section.

(j) The department shall not issue any license under this section after July 1, 2033.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 412, Sec. 1.   (SB 395)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.23.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of San Luis Obispo, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. The department shall not issue more than five licenses under this section per year.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961. 

(c) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.

(d) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(e) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by
 this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 568, Sec. 1.   (AB 1008)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23826.24.

(a) Notwithstanding this chapter, in the County of Los Angeles, the department may issue no more than 12 new original neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses to bona fide public eating places located in any of the census tracts listed in subdivision (b) per year beginning on January 1, 2026, until a total of 40 new licenses authorized by this section are issued.

(b) To qualify for a license issued pursuant to this section, the premises for which the license would apply shall be located within one of the following United States Census Bureau census tracts, corresponding
 to those identified within the 2020 Census, located within the County of Los Angeles, subject to the following limitations:

(1) United States Census Bureau census tract 2060.10, 2060.20, 2060.51, 2060.52, 2062.01, 2062.02, 2063.01, 2063.02, 2063.03, 2071.01, 2071.02, 2071.03, 2073.03, 2073.04, 2073.05, 2073.06, 2073.07, 2073.08, 2074, 2075.01, 2075.02, 2077.11, 2077.12, 2079.01, 2079.02, 2240.10, 2240.20, 2260.01, 2260.02, 2283.20, 2284.20, 2285, 2286, 2292, 2293, 2294.10, 2294.20, 2318, 2319.01, 2319.02, or 2328. No more than a total of 20 neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within all of these tracts.

(2) United States Census Bureau census tract 1990.01, 1990.02, 1991.20, 1992.01, 1992.02, 1997, 1998.01,
 1998.02, 1999, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2035, 2036.01, 2036.02, 2037.10, 2037.20, 2038, 2039, 2041.10, 2041.20, 2042, 2043, 2044.10, 2044.20, 2046, 2047, 2048.10, 2048.20, 2049.10, 2049.20, 2051.10, 2051.20, 2060.50, 2060.53, or 2060.54. No more than a total of 20 neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within all of these tracts.

(3) United States Census Bureau census tract 1895.01, 1895.02, 1897.02, 1898.01, 1898.02, 1899.03, 1899.04, 1899.05, 1899.06, 1899.07, 1901.01, 1901.02, 1902.01, 1902.02, 1903.02, 1903.03, 1905.10, 1907.01, 1907.02, 1908.01, 1908.02, 1909.01, 1909.02, 1910, 1916.10, 1917.10, 1917.20, 1918.10, 1918.20, 1919.01, 1941.01, 1941.02, 1942, 1943, 2083.01, 2083.02, 2084.01, 2084.02, 2085.01, 2085.02, 2086.10, 2086.20, 2098.10, 2098.20, 2100.10, 2123.03, 2123.04,
 2123.05, 2123.06, 2124.10, 2124.20, 2125.01, 2125.02, 2132.01, 2133.10, 2133.20, 2134.02, 2211.10, 2211.20, 2212.20, 2216.02, or 2611.03. No more than a total of 20 neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general licenses shall be concurrently held at premises located within all of these tracts.

(c) In issuing the license pursuant to this section, the department shall follow the procedures set forth in Section 23961. A license shall not be issued pursuant to this section to an applicant until any existing on-sale licenses issued to the applicant for the same premises are canceled.

(d) (1) A person who currently holds an on-sale general license for a premises, who holds any interest in an on-sale general license for a premises, who has held an on-sale general
 license for a premises within the 12 months before the date of the drawing required by Section 23961, or who has held any interest in an on-sale general license for a premises within the 12 months before the date of the drawing required by Section 23961, shall not be eligible for a license issued pursuant to this section for that licensed premises.

(2) In addition to the other requirements of this section, an application for a neighborhood-restricted on-sale general license shall be subject to all the requirements that apply to an on-sale general license for a bona fide eating place.

(e) (1) A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferred between counties.

(2) Except as
 provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), a license issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferred to any other premises.

(3) Paragraph (2) shall not apply to any licensee whose premises have been destroyed as a result of fire or any act of God or other force beyond the control of the licensee, for whom the provisions of Section 24081 shall apply.

(4) The department may allow a license issued pursuant to this section to be transferred within the same neighborhood, as described in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b).

(5) A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.

(f) Following the cancellation or revocation of a license issued pursuant to this section, the department may issue one additional new original neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general license following the procedure set forth in Section 23961 and the provisions of this section.

(g) A person who holds a neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general license issued pursuant to this section shall not exchange that license for an on-sale license for public premises.

(h) Except as specified herein, a neighborhood-restricted special on-sale general license may exercise all of the privileges, and is subject to all the restrictions, of an on-sale general license for a bona fide eating place.

(i) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section. 

(j) The department may adopt rules and regulations to enforce this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.   (AB 828)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23827.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in any county where the inhabitants number less than 7,000 and where the major economy of that county is dependent upon tourism and the continual use of that county’s recreational facilities, the department may issue four additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. Any premises to qualify for a license under this section shall have a seating capacity for 100 or more diners. In no event shall more than four such licenses be issued under this section.

(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in
 Section 23961.

(c) A license issued pursuant to this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 230, Sec. 1.   (AB 3285)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Issuance and Transfer of Licenses [23950. - 24082.]



  ARTICLE 1. Applications for Licenses [23950. - 23962.]

23950.

Application for a license shall be made to the department upon a form prescribed by the department and shall be accompanied by such other information as the department may require to assist it in determining whether the applicant and the premises qualify for a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1270.)
-------------------------------------------

23951.

The application shall contain the following information:

(a) The name of the applicant.

(b) For a general partnership, the names of the individual partners.

(c) For a limited partnership, limited liability company, or a corporation, the name of the entity.

(d) The location of the premises for which the license
 is applied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 639, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

23952.

The application shall also contain a statement to the effect that the applicant has not been convicted of a felony and has not violated and will not violate or cause or permit to be violated any of the provisions of this division or any rule of the department applicable to the applicant or pertaining to the manufacture, sale, or distribution of alcoholic beverages, particularly any of the provisions of Sections 25500 to 25504, inclusive, or Sections 25611 to 25615, inclusive. If the applicant cannot make this statement the application shall contain a statement of the violation, if any, or reasons which will prevent the applicant from being able to comply with the requirements
 with respect to the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23953.

(a) The application shall be signed by the applicant.

(b) For a general partnership, the application shall be signed by each of the partners, and for the purposes of this division the partners shall be deemed the applicant for any license and the licensees under any license issued pursuant to that application.

(c) For a limited partnership, the application for any license shall be signed by each of the general
 partners.

(d) For a limited liability company that has elected to be managed by its members, the application shall be signed by each member or by an officer authorized by the articles of organization or the operating agreement to bind the company. In the case of a limited liability company that has elected to be managed by a manager or managers, the application shall be signed by the manager or managers or by an officer authorized by the articles of organization or the operating agreement to bind the company.

(e) For a corporation, the application shall be signed by two officers of the corporation, one from each of the following categories:

(1) The chairperson of the board, the president, or a vice president.

(2) The secretary, assistant secretary,
 chief financial officer, or assistant treasurer.
